Utah statutes.
26-3-2.   Powers of department to collect and maintain health data.

The department may on a voluntary basis, except when there is specific legal authority to compel reporting of health data:

(1)  collect and maintain health data on:

(a)  the extent, nature, and impact of illness and disability on the population of the state;

(b)  the determinants of health and health hazards;

(c)  health resources, including the extent of available manpower and resources;

(d)  utilization of health care;

(e)  health care costs and financing; or

(f)  other health or health-related matters;

(2)  undertake and support research, demonstrations, and evaluations respecting new or improved methods for obtaining current data on the matters referred to in Subsection (1) of this section;

(3)  collect health data under other authorities and on behalf of other governmental or not-for-profit organizations.

